Wisconsin, session 2025, AB226.
do enact as follows:AB226,14Section 1. 118.073 of the statutes is created to read:AB226,2,35118.073 Prohibited ingredients in school meals. (1) No school board or 6charter school authorized under s. 118.40 (2r) or (2x) may provide to a pupil as part 1of a free or reduced-price meal provided under the national school lunch program 2under 42 USC 1751 to 1769j or the federal school breakfast program under 42 USC 31773 food that contains any of the following ingredients:AB226,2,44(a) Brominated vegetable oil.AB226,2,55(b) Potassium bromate.AB226,2,66(c) Propylparaben.AB226,2,77(d) Azodicarbonamide.AB226,2,88(e) Red dye 3.AB226,2,129(2) This section does not prohibit a school board or a charter school 10authorized under s. 118.40 (2r) or (2x) from allowing a private entity to serve food 11that contains any of the ingredients under sub. (1) (a) to (e) on school premises or at 12a school-sponsored activity.AB226,213Section 2. 119.04 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB226,3,314119.04 (1) Subchapters IV, V and VII of ch. 115, ch. 121 and ss. 66.0235 (3) (c), 1566.0603 (1m) to (3), 115.01 (1) and (2), 115.28, 115.31, 115.33, 115.34, 115.343, 16115.345, 115.363, 115.364, 115.365 (3), 115.366, 115.367, 115.38 (2), 115.415, 17115.445, 118.001 to 118.04, 118.045, 118.06, 118.07, 118.073, 118.075, 118.076, 18118.10, 118.12, 118.124, 118.125 to 118.14, 118.145 (4), 118.15, 118.153, 118.16, 19118.162, 118.163, 118.164, 118.18, 118.19, 118.196, 118.20, 118.223, 118.225, 20118.24 (1), (2) (c) to (f), (6), (8), and (10), 118.245, 118.25, 118.255, 118.258, 118.291, 21118.292, 118.293, 118.2935, 118.30 to 118.43, 118.46, 118.50, 118.51, 118.52, 22118.53, 118.55, 118.56, 118.58, 120.12 (2m), (4m), (5), and (15) to (27), 120.125, 23120.13 (1), (2) (b) to (g), (3), (14), (17) to (19), (26), (34), (35), (37), (37m), and (38), 24120.137, 120.14, 120.20, 120.21 (3), and 120.25 are applicable to a 1st class city 1school district and board but not, unless explicitly provided in this chapter or in the 2terms of a contract, to the commissioner or to any school transferred to an 3opportunity schools and partnership program.AB226,34Section 3. Effective date.AB226,3,55(1) This act takes effect on July 1, 2027.AB226,3,66